Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202090-238
Department of Transportation; acquire described property.

The Department of Transportation is authorized to acquire from the Chicago and North Western Transportation Company its abandoned right-of-way described as follows: All of Chicago and North Western Transportation Company abandoned right-of-way in section 34, township 15 north, range 7 east, Saunders County, Nebraska. The department is also authorized to acquire all rights, interests, and titles related to such abandoned right-of-way.

Laws 1984, LB 853, § 1;

Laws 2017, LB339, § 297.